test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-akkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - akkõ: # Verb 36 'eng /est hakata/fin' - full paradigm
     akkõ+V+Inf: akkõ
     akkõ+V+Ger: akkõs
     akkõ+V+Sup: akkõm
     akkõ+V+Sup+Ine: akkõmõs
     akkõ+V+Sup+Ela: akkõmõst
     akkõ+V+Sup+Tra: akkõmõks
     akkõ+V+Sup+Abe: akkõmõt
     akkõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: akūb
     akkõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: akkõt
     akkõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: akūbõd
     akkõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: akīz
     akkõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [akīzt, akīztõ]
     akkõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [akīzt, akīztõ]
     akkõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ak
     akkõ+V+Cond+Sg3: akkõks
     akkõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ak
     akkõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ak
     akkõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: akkõgid
     akkõ+V+Jus+Sg3: akkõg
     akkõ+V+Quo+Sg3: akkiji
     akkõ+V+ActPrfPrc: akkõn
     akkõ+V+PssPrfPrc: aktõd
